Utah statutes.
78B-15-621.   Adjudication of parentage -- Dismissal for want of prosecution.

The tribunal may issue an order dismissing a proceeding commenced under this chapter for want of prosecution only without prejudice.  An order of dismissal for want of prosecution purportedly with prejudice is void and has only the effect of a dismissal without prejudice.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

